Utah, session 2026, SB255.
Section 1. Section 35A-8-2501 is enacted to read:35A-8-2501. Homelessness in Vulnerable Populations Task Force -- Creation -- Membership -- Compensation -- Staff.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Coordinator" means the state homelessness coordinator appointed under Section 63J-4-202. (b)"Task force" means the Homelessness in Vulnerable Populations Task Force created in Subsection (2).(c)"Vulnerable populations" means individuals or families living in Davis County, Salt Lake County, Summit County, Utah County, and Weber County who experience barriers to obtaining and maintaining safe and stable housing because of:(i)a developmental disability;(ii)domestic violence;(iii)severe mental illness;(iv)substance abuse; (v)age-based limitations on the individual's or family member's ability to work;(vi)financial hardship because of pregnancy, childbirth, or having an adult or child in the family who is medically frail or who has a disability;(vii)if a youth, aging out of foster care and having limited family support, assets, or work experience; or(viii)other limiting factors.(2)There is created within the division the Homelessness in Vulnerable Populations Task Force composed of the following 17 members:(a)(i)the director of the division or the director's designee;(ii)the chair of the board of trustees of the Utah Housing Corporation or the chair's designee; and(iii)the state homelessness coordinator or the coordinator's designee;(b)one individual representing the Organizing Committee for the 2034 Olympic and Paralympic Winter Games, nominated by the Organizing Committee;(c)six individuals representing public housing authorities, recommended by the director, one each from:(i)the Davis Community Housing Authority;(ii)the Housing Authority of Salt Lake City;(iii)Housing Connect;(iv)the Summit Combined Housing Authority;(v)the Housing Authority of Utah County; and(vi)the Weber Housing Authority;(d)three individuals representing the state's continuum of care organizations, recommended by the coordinator, one each from:(i)Salt Lake Valley Coalition to End Homelessness;(ii)Mountainland Continuum of Care; and(iii)Utah Balance of State Continuum of Care;(e)one individual representing the Utah Impact Partnership, recommended by the coordinator;(f)one individual representing Shelter the Homeless, recommended by the coordinator;(g)one individual representing a nonprofit organization that addresses issues related to affordable and supportive housing, recommended by the director; and(h)one individual representing a for-profit organization that develops projects that include deeply affordable housing, recommended by the director.(3)(a)When a vacancy occurs in a position described under Subsection (2)(b) through (h), the nominating or recommending authority shall nominate or recommend an individual to fill the vacant position.(b)A member serves until the member's successor is appointed.(4)(a)The task force shall select two members to serve as co-chairs, one of whom shall be a member described in Subsection (2)(a).(b)Subject to the other provisions of this Subsection (4), the co-chairs are responsible for the call and conduct of meetings.(c)The co-chairs shall call and hold meetings of the task force at least once per month.(d)One or more additional meetings may be called upon request by a majority of the task force's members.(5)A majority of the members of the task force constitutes a quorum.(6)The action of a majority of a quorum constitutes the action of the task force.(7)A member of the task force described in Subsection (2) may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:(a)Section 63A-3-106;(b)Section 63A-3-107; and(c)rules made by the Division of Finance in accordance with Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.(8)The task force shall, in anticipation of the 2034 Olympic and Paralympic Winter Games:(a)assess the housing needs of vulnerable populations, including the need for homeless shelters, supportive housing, and affordable housing options;(b)determine what housing gaps may exist within the vulnerable populations, including a lack of homeless shelters, safety concerns, and integrated or accessible affordable homes;(c)analyze the risks of displacement of vulnerable populations from rental units, hotels, or motels due to increased 2034  Olympic and Paralympic Winter Games housing needs;(d)analyze the costs of producing affordable housing to support vulnerable populations; and(e)identify potential funding sources to support the affordable housing needs of vulnerable populations, including receiving funds from:(i)legislative appropriations;(ii)private donations or grants;(iii)public-private partnerships;(iv)private sponsors;(v)social impact bonds; or(vi)any other federal, state, or philanthropic source.(9)The task force shall:(a)create a report that:(i)details the task force's conclusions on the items described in Subsection (8); and(ii)includes recommendations on legislation needed to address or implement the task force's conclusions; and(b)report on the findings described in Subsection (9)(a) to the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee no later than the November 2026, interim meeting.(10)The division shall provide administrative support to the task force.(11)Meetings of the task force are subject to Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63I-2-235 is amended to read:63I-2-235. Repeal dates: Title 35A.(1)Section 35A-3-212, Use of COVID-19 relief funds -- Grants to child care providers -- Reporting requirements, is repealed June 30, 2025.(2)Section 35A-8-2501, Homelessness in Vulnerable Populations Task Force, is repealed December 31, 2026.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.